Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201284-511
Electronic transmission
and filing of documents.

The Secretary of State may provide
for the electronic transmission and filing of documents delivered for filing
under (1) the Business Corporation Act, the Limited Liability Company Act,
the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act, the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation
Act, the Nebraska Professional Corporation Act, the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, the
Nebraska Uniform Limited Partnership Act, the Nonstock Cooperative Marketing
Act, the Uniform Partnership Act of 1998, and the Trademark Registration Act
and (2) any filing provisions of sections 21-1301 to 21-1306, 21-1333 to 21-1339,
and 87-208 to 87-219.01. The Secretary of State shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations to implement this section.

Laws 2010, LB791, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB462, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB733, § 1.
July 19, 2012

Business Corporation Act, see section 21-2001.

Limited Liability Company Act, see section 21-2601.

Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act, see section 21-2901.

Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, see section 21-1901.

Nebraska Professional Corporation Act, see section 21-2201.

Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, see section 21-101.

Nebraska Uniform Limited Partnership Act, see section 67-296.

Nonstock Cooperative Marketing Act, see section 21-1401.

Trademark Registration Act, see section 87-126.

Uniform Partnership Act of 1998, see section 67-401.